Rhode Island statutes. Title 35 Public Finance
Chapter 4 State Funds

35-4-1.
Revenue credited to general fund — Exceptions — Deposits.

All receipts and revenue of the state shall be credited by the general treasurer to the general fund of the state with the exception of receipts or revenue pertaining to the following funds:

Permanent school fund;

Touro Jewish synagogue fund;

Land-grant fund of 1862;

Veterans’ home fund;

United States cooperative vocational education fund;

United States industrial rehabilitation fund;

Forestry cooperative fund;

State sinking fund;

Fire insurance fund;

Fund for relief of firemen;

Fund for relief of policemen;

Coastal Resources Management Council Dredge Fund;

Funds received from the federal government in accordance with the provisions of parts 1 and 2 of title V of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 501 et seq.;

Any other funds that may by federal law or regulation, or by enactment of the general assembly, be allocated to a specific fund, provided, that nothing contained in this section shall amend or modify: §

19-3.1-9

, which pertains to securities deposited by trust companies and national banks having trust departments; §

19-5-15

, which pertains to credit unions; nor §

27-1-5

, which pertains to deposits of securities by insurance companies with the general treasurer; and

Funds received until June 30, 2002, from the northeast dairy compact commission, which was enacted into law in Rhode Island by P.L. 1993, ch. 106, §

2-24-1

et seq. These funds are to be passed from the northeast dairy compact commission through the department of elementary and secondary education to reimburse school districts for school milk that is exempted from the federal over-order price regulation obligation at 7 CFR 1301. These funds are to be placed in a restricted receipt account established within the department of elementary and secondary education separate from all other accounts within the department of elementary and secondary education. All funds deposited in the restricted receipt account established in this section shall be disbursed prior to June 30, 2002.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 51; impl. am. P.L. 1949, ch. 2166, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

35-4-1

; P.L. 1985, ch. 402, § 4; P.L. 1986, ch. 287, art. 28, § 3; P.L. 2000, ch. 344, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 469, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 36, § 2.

35-4-2.
Payments to general treasurer — Allocations to specific funds.

All revenue of the state of whatever character shall be paid into the hands of the general treasurer and credited to the general funds of the state, except in such cases as the general assembly may by law specifically allocate to a special fund; provided, that any moneys appropriated by law for the establishment of a permanent fund for the support of the public schools, in accordance with the provisions of

R.I. Const., Art. XII

, shall remain a special fund for that purpose.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 52; G.L. 1956, §

35-4-2

.

35-4-3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 53; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; Repealed by P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 28, § 1, effective June 7, 1991.

35-4-4.
Safekeeping and disbursement of funds.

All moneys due to the state shall be paid to the general treasurer, who shall be responsible for the safekeeping and proper disbursement thereof according to law.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 33, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 43, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 44, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 24, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

35-4-4

.

35-4-4.1.
State Linked Deposit Policy — Short title.

Sections

35-4-4.1

—

35-4-4.6

shall be known as the “State Linked Deposit Policy”, as it will link the deposit of state funds with bank performance as determined by the rating system utilized by federal regulatory authorities in compliance with the provisions of the federal Community Reinvestment Act (CRA), 12 U.S.C. § 2901 et seq., and the federal Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989 (FIRREA), 12 U.S.C. § 3331 et seq.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 175, § 1.

35-4-4.2.
State Linked Deposit Policy — Legislative purpose.

The purpose of §§

35-4-4.1

—

35-4-4.6

is to increase the availability of capital and banking services in low and moderate income neighborhoods of Rhode Island by using state deposits as an incentive. Sections

35-4-4.1

—

35-4-4.6

uses the federal evaluation of CRA performance in helping the state decide where to deposit its funds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 175, § 1.

35-4-4.3.
State Linked Deposit Policy — Deposit of funds.

The state, and its agencies and quasi-public authorities, shall invest or hold funds on deposit, whether temporarily or permanently, only at federally insured and regulated banks that are deemed to be financially sound or in money funds offered by banks directly or through their affiliates or subsidiaries, according to state investment commission rules, regulations, and guidelines and also in full compliance with the federal Community Reinvestment Act (CRA), 12 U.S.C. § 2901 et seq. Initially, full compliance shall mean that the bank has been reviewed at least once by the appropriate federal regulatory authority and has achieved the “outstanding” or “satisfactory” rating for compliance at the time of its latest review. Should a bank’s rating fall below “satisfactory”, the state shall have a reasonable amount of time to withdraw its funds. Preference will be given in the placement of state funds to those banks which have achieved a CRA rating of “outstanding”. A system for determining this preference will be established in writing by the general treasurer after consultation with the state investment commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 175, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 416, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 207, § 1.

35-4-4.4.
State Linked Deposit Policy — Exceptions.

Nothing in §§

35-4-4.1

—

35-4-4.6

shall be construed as to require the state, or its agencies and instrumentalities, to liquidate existing funds on deposit prior to their maturity date(s) in order to comply with §§

35-4-4.1

—

35-4-4.6

.

Sections

35-4-4.1

—

35-4-4.6

are not applicable with respect to funds on deposit that were received from the proceeds of either bond or note offerings that have received ratings from at least one national credit rating service of at least A-1 or MIG 1 with respect to short-term borrowings or A with respect to long-term borrowings. In determining which financial institutions shall hold these investments, preference shall be given to those financial institutions that have achieved an “outstanding” CRA rating.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 175, § 1.

35-4-4.5.
State Linked Deposit Policy — Enforcement.

The general treasurer shall have the responsibility for monitoring and enforcing the provisions of §§

35-4-4.1

—

35-4-4.6

. Each institution shall be required to file its latest public disclosure of its CRA performance evaluation with the general treasurer by November 30 of each year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 175, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 416, § 1.

35-4-4.6.
State Linked Deposit Policy — Definitions — Exemptions.

As used in §§

35-4-4.1

—

35-4-4.6

, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Community Reinvestment Act (CRA)” shall mean the Community Reinvestment Act as enacted by the federal government as title VIII of the Housing and Community Development Act of 1977, 12 U.S.C. § 2901 et seq., and all subsequent amendments and regulations.

“Banks” shall mean those federally insured and regulated depository institutions which are the recipients or potential recipients of state deposits. State or federally chartered credit unions are not “banks” under §§

35-4-4.1

—

35-4-4.6

.

“Federal regulatory agencies” shall mean the federal reserve board, federal deposit insurance corporation (FDIC), comptroller of the currency, and the office of thrift supervision (OTS).

“Funds on deposit” shall mean those monies which are designated for general operating purposes, including all revenues from taxes, fees and fines, and federal aid; and also, all special purpose funds, restricted receipt accounts, and trust accounts.

Any investments of the state and municipal employees retirement systems shall be exempt from the provisions of §§

35-4-4.1

—

35-4-4.6

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 175, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 416, § 1.

35-4-4.7.
Public disclosure.

Any bank otherwise eligible for deposits or investments under this chapter shall make available for public inspection, upon request, the following:

The latest CRA statement;

The most recent CRA public disclosure report by the appropriate regulatory organization(s);

The most recent report under the federal Home Mortgage Disclosure Act, 12 U.S.C. § 2801 et seq.; and

Any documents relating to fair lending audits.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a bank to make public any document not otherwise deemed public by applicable state or federal law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 416, § 2.

35-4-5.
Deposit of funds — Purchase of bonds and securities.

The general treasurer shall deposit or place, subject to his or her order, for the use of the state, all of the funds of the state received by him or her, in such a safe and responsible bank or banks, or trust company or trust companies, within this state having a paid-in capital of not less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), or with any safe and responsible institution within this state whose accounts are insured by any instrumentality of the United States government, as will give the greatest rate of interest therefor, and may, subject to the approval of the state investment commission as provided in chapter 10 of title 35, purchase from time to time, for the investment of surplus funds, state bonds and United States government securities, and with state approval, dispose of bonds and securities when the funds are needed for the general purposes of the state, and all state bonds so purchased shall not become subject to the provisions of §

35-8-2

.

The state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for such sums as may from time to time be required for the purchase of bonds and securities upon receipt by him or her of proper vouchers approved by the state investment commission.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 33, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 43, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 44, § 5; P.L. 1929, ch. 1409, § 1; P.L. 1938, ch. 2591, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 24, § 5; P.L. 1939, ch. 687, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; P.L. 1951, ch. 2730, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

35-4-5

; impl. am. P.L. 1958, ch. 164.

35-4-6.
Acceptance of gifts and bequests.

The general treasurer is authorized and empowered, with the approval of the director of administration, to accept on behalf of the state any gift or bequest of personal property, money, securities, or other similar gift or bequest, given to the state absolutely by any state employee, person, or organization; provided, that no acceptance by the state shall make the state in any manner legally or equitably liable to any state employee, person, or organization relative to the care, preservation, or use of the gift, bequest, or property; provided further, that the right shall be reserved by the general treasurer, and/or the director of administration, to refuse any gift or bequest so offered to the state; and provided further, that to the extent any gift or bequest is placed in a restricted receipt account, the gift and any identifiable earnings thereon shall remain in that account in the event any existing and/or future funds in the account are diverted or otherwise transferred or withdrawn to the general fund or used for any other use whatsoever.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 24, § 5; P.L. 1939, ch. 687, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

35-4-6

; P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 22, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 109; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 44, § 1.

35-4-7.
Sale of gifts and bequests — Deposit of proceeds.

Whenever a gift or bequest is in the form of personal property, securities, or a similar gift or bequest, the general treasurer is authorized and empowered in his or her discretion to sell at public sale that gift or bequest, and the receipts from the sale or sales and all other moneys accepted by the state as a gift or bequest to the state shall be deposited by the general treasurer in the general treasury in the general fund for the use of the state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 24, § 5; P.L. 1939, ch. 687, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

35-4-7

.

35-4-8.
Checks for payments from treasury.

All payments from the state treasury shall be made by checks issued by the general treasurer, and each check shall bear an identification number or letter, or a combination of numbers or letters, and the general treasurer shall keep as a part of the records of his or her office the date of the issuance of each check drawn, the identification number or letter, the amount of the check, the payee to whom it is issued, and the appropriation to which the amount of the check is charged.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 33, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 43, § 9; P.L. 1921, ch. 2038, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 44, § 9; P.L. 1928, ch. 1139, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 24, § 9; P.L. 1954, ch. 3288, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

35-4-8

.

35-4-9.
Monthly reconciliation of depository accounts — Stopping payment on unpaid checks.

At least once a month the general treasurer shall obtain from each of the several depositories holding funds of the state, an account of the funds carried by him or her with the depository, shall compare the account with the records of his or her office, and shall list all outstanding checks issued by him or her and not returned by a depository as paid. Once annually, on June 30, the general treasurer shall notify all depositories holding funds of the state to stop payment on all checks listed as unpaid during the previous calendar year, and the amount shall be recovered into the general treasury as a miscellaneous receipt.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 33, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 43, § 9; P.L. 1921, ch. 2038, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 44, § 9; P.L. 1928, ch. 1139, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 24, § 9; P.L. 1954, ch. 3288, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

35-4-9

; P.L. 1985, ch. 469, § 1.

35-4-10.
Veterans’ disability allowances unimpaired.

Nothing in this title or in any general or public law shall be construed to allow or permit any officer of the state to require any veteran of any war in which the United States was engaged to surrender to the state the whole or any part of his or her service connected disability compensation, nor shall this compensation be deducted from the salary or wages of the veteran.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 24, § 5; P.L. 1939, ch. 685, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

35-4-10

.

35-4-11.
Intermodal surface transportation fund.

State funds, whether appropriations or bond funds, allotted for department of transportation purposes, upon initiation by the budget officer and approved by the director of administration, may be transferred to a special fund called the intermodal surface transportation fund and shall be expended for the specific purposes for which they were made available. All sums received from the federal government for expenditure by the state for highway purposes shall be turned over to the general treasurer and placed in the fund for the specific purpose designated by the United States government. The fund shall be administered by the director of transportation, subject to the same state laws and fiscal procedures as the general funds of the state; and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment out of the fund of such sums as may be required, from time to time, upon receipt by him or her of duly authenticated vouchers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 263, art. 4, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 129, art. 9, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 30, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 7, § 2.

35-4-12.
Federal reduction relief fund — Creation.

There is hereby created a federal reduction relief fund in order to maintain essential state services that would otherwise be diminished or eliminated by reductions in federal funding for these services for any federal fiscal year.

The federal reduction relief fund shall be used for the purposes set forth in §§

35-4-13

—

35-4-13.4

.

In the event that at the close of a fiscal year the balance in the fund is less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), the balance shall lapse to general fund surplus and shall be made available for future appropriation by the general assembly.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 181, art. 36, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 17, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 579, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 23, § 1.

35-4-13.
Federal reduction relief fund — Appropriations for essential state services.

An amount not to exceed seven million dollars ($7,000,000) shall be used to fund state appropriations in order to maintain essential state services that would otherwise be diminished or eliminated by reductions in federal funding for these services for any federal fiscal year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 181, art. 36, § 1.

35-4-13.1.
Federal reduction relief fund — Appropriations for excellence in education.

The general assembly may from time to time appropriate monies to the elementary and secondary education excellence fund as set forth in §

16-5-32

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 17, § 2.

35-4-13.2.
Federal reduction relief fund — Appropriations for textbook modernization and improvement fund.

The general assembly may from time to time appropriate monies from the fund to the textbook modernization and improvement fund as established in chapter 23 of title 16.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 17, § 2.

35-4-13.3.
Federal reduction relief fund — Appropriations for job development programs.

The general assembly may from time to time appropriate monies from the fund to the economic development corporation for the expansion of job development activities.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 17, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 12, § 13.

35-4-13.4.
Federal reduction relief fund — Appropriations for housing programs.

The general assembly may from time to time appropriate monies from the fund to the office of intergovernmental relations in the executive department for the purpose of establishing housing programs for low or moderate income persons or families.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 579, § 3.

35-4-14.
Federal reduction relief fund — Interest earned on investment.

Monies accruing due to the investment of the federal reduction relief fund shall remain unencumbered and a part of the fund.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 181, art. 36, § 1.

35-4-15.
Federal reduction relief fund — Replenishment of fund.

The general assembly may from time to time appropriate monies to replenish the federal reduction relief fund.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 181, art. 36, § 1.

35-4-16.
Federal reduction relief fund — Severability.

If any provision of §§

35-4-12

—

35-4-16

, or the application thereof, shall for any reason be judged invalid, that judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder of the law, but shall be confined in its effect to the provision or application directly involved in the controversy giving rise to the judgment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 181, art. 36, § 1.

35-4-17.
Central cancer registry and prevention fund.

There is hereby created and established in the state treasury a fund to be known as the “central cancer registry and prevention fund”, to which shall be deposited the revenues derived from the tax imposed in former §

44-20-13.1

, repealed in 1986. All money now or hereafter in the central cancer registry and prevention fund are hereby dedicated for the purpose of the establishment of a continuous cancer registry and prevention program. The department of health is charged with the administration of this fund for the purposes specified in this section. The amount of money credited to the central cancer registry and prevention fund shall not exceed four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) per fiscal year, and any moneys in excess thereof derived from this tax shall be credited to the general fund. All claims against the fund shall be examined, audited, and allowed in the manner now or hereafter provided by law for claims against the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 402, § 5.

35-4-18.
Health education, alcohol, and substance abuse prevention program.

There is hereby created and established a program to be known as the “health education, alcohol, and substance abuse prevention program”, which shall be funded annually by the general assembly. All moneys now or hereafter in the health education, alcohol, and substance abuse prevention program are hereby appropriated for the purpose of establishing continuous health education programs dealing primarily in the areas of alcohol and substance abuse for students in grades kindergarten (K) through twelve (12). The department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals and the department of elementary and secondary education are charged with administration of the program for the purposes specified in this section. Independent evaluation of the programs in grades kindergarten (K) through twelve (12) shall be made annually. Funds for evaluation shall emanate from the health education, alcohol, and substance abuse appropriations. Claims against the funds shall be examined, audited, and allowed in the manner now or hereafter provided by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 412, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 418, § 6; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 14, § 6; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 178; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 22.

35-4-19.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 37, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 5, § 1 effective July 1, 1993.

35-4-20.
Contribution of money from water development account fund.

A contribution of money based upon the annual statewide cost allocation plan, representing the estimated pro rata share of statewide indirect costs paid from the general fund, shall be made from the water development account fund.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 10, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 397, § 2.

35-4-20.1.
Contribution of money from water development fund — When and how contributions to be made.

The enumeration of the money or trust funds set forth in §

35-4-20

shall not prohibit the applicability thereto of §

35-4-20

.3 should the director of administration determine that for the reasons mentioned in §

35-4-20.2

the money or trust funds should be exempt, as it is the purpose of this chapter to exempt all trust funds from force and effect of § 35-4-20 where, by the operation of this chapter, federal matching funds or contributions to any trust fund would be lost by the state when contribution is to be made. The deduction hereby required shall be paid into the general fund by the state treasurer semiannually in July and January of each year and when so paid into the general fund shall thereupon become a part of that fund to be accounted for and disbursed as provided by law with respect to the general fund.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 10, § 1.

35-4-20.2.
Contribution of money from water development fund — Exemptions where federal assistance suspended.

Should any state fund be the recipient of contributions, either by the matching of state funds or by a general donation to state funds, and the payment of money into the general fund should cause the fund to lose federal assistance, the governor shall certify to the state treasurer that the fund is for that reason exempt from the force and effect of §§

35-4-20

—

35-4-20

.3.

Should it be determined by the director of administration that, by reason of payments already made into the general fund by any fund under this chapter, the fund is subject to the loss of federal assistance, then the governor shall certify to the state treasurer that the fund is exempt from the provisions of §§

35-4-20

—

35-4-20

.3, and the state treasurer shall thereupon refund and pay over to the fund any amount or amounts previously paid into the general fund by that fund.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 10, § 1.

35-4-20.3.
Contribution of money from water development fund — Application for refunds.

Application for refunds as provided by this section shall be filed with the controller, except as otherwise provided in this section, within three (3) years after the right to a refund shall have accrued, else the right shall be barred. The controller may delegate the authority to accept an application for refund to any state agency vested by law with the responsibility for the collection of any tax, license, or account due. An application for refund shall be on a form approved by the controller and shall be supplemented with any additional proof as the controller deems necessary to establish the claim; provided, that the claim is not otherwise barred under the laws of this state. Upon receipt of an application for refund, the state agency to which the funds were paid shall make a determination of the amount due. If an application for refund is denied, in whole or in part, the state agency shall so notify the applicant, stating the reasons therefor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 10, § 1.

35-4-21.
Basic health plan trust account.

There is hereby established in the general fund a separate account to be known as the “basic health plan trust account”, to which shall be deposited any surplus revenues which are approved by the governor and general assembly for this purpose. All moneys now or hereafter in the basic health plan trust account are hereby dedicated for the purpose of providing health insurance to the uninsured in this state. The department of health is charged with the administration of this fund to subsidize the purchase of basic health care benefits for low income Rhode Islanders. The amount of money credited to the basic health plan trust account shall not exceed three million dollars ($3,000,000) per fiscal year. All claims against the fund shall be examined, audited, and allowed in the manner now or hereafter provided by law for claims against the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 271, § 2.

35-4-22.
Inclusion of restricted and special revenue funds in budget.

Pursuant to §

35-3-7

, the budget officer shall include all restricted and dedicated revenues received or anticipated by state agencies as a part of the budget request, showing for each budgetary category the amount of nongeneral revenue monies requested or anticipated, and the total anticipated expenditure from all sources for the respective category.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 76, § 3.

35-4-22.1.
Legislative appropriation authority.

No agency shall establish new programs, or expand existing programs, including any program involving nonstate monies, beyond the scope of those already established, recognized, and appropriated for by the general assembly until the program and the availability of money is submitted by the agency to the budget officer for recommendation to the general assembly.

No state agency may make expenditures of any restricted or special revenue funds, whether these monies are received prior to expenditure or as reimbursement, unless these expenditures are made pursuant to specific appropriations of the general assembly.

To the extent permitted by federal law, any federal funds or assistance appropriated, authorized, allocated, or apportioned to the state of Rhode Island shall be subject to appropriation by the general assembly except where otherwise provided in this chapter or chapter 41 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 76, § 3; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 19, § 2; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 2, § 5, effective July 6, 2021.

35-4-22.2.
Use of restricted or special revenue funds.

Any restricted or special revenue funds that are received by a state agency that is not otherwise appropriated to that state agency by the annual appropriation acts of the regular session of the general assembly are hereby appropriated for that state agency for the purpose set forth, except that no expenditure shall be made from and no obligation shall be incurred against any restricted receipts or special revenue fund that has not been previously appropriated or reappropriated or approved by the governor, the speaker of the house, and the president of the senate, until that authorization has been transmitted to the state agency to make expenditure therefrom.

State agencies desiring the governor’s approval to expend or obligate receipts not appropriated or reappropriated by the general assembly in the annual appropriation act or supplemental appropriation act shall forward a request to the state budget officer, who shall forward a copy to the speaker of the house and the president of the senate.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the budget officer is hereby authorized to create restricted receipt accounts within the budget of any state agency to account for the receipt and expenditure of a multistate settlement administered by the office of the attorney general. Expenditures from these accounts shall remain subject to the provisions of §§

35-4-22

,

35-4-22

.1,

35-4-22.2

, and

35-4-27

.

Upon the directive of the controller, with the consent of the auditor general, the budget officer is hereby authorized to convert any escrow liability accounts that were established before July 1, 2021, to a restricted receipt account.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 76, § 3; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 71; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 2, § 5, effective July 6, 2021.

35-4-22.3.
Exceptions and exclusions to §§ 35-4-22.1 and 35-4-22.2.

Dedicated receipts and special revenue funds received by “self supporting” or “proprietary” state agencies that derive all their financing from sources other than the general fund are exempt from the provisions of §§

35-4-22.1

and

35-4-22.2

. Colleges and universities under the control of the board of governors for higher education are also exempt from these provisions.

Whenever in carrying out any specific project or service the cost of which is to be paid by restricted or dedicated revenues, it is necessary for the state to make payment in the first instance subject to reimbursement in full by the monies to be received, the state controller and the general treasurer are hereby authorized to make payments upon the receipt of duly authenticated vouchers, provided payments are authorized by the appropriation, reappropriation, or approvals specified in §

35-4-22.2

by the governor, speaker of the house, and president of the senate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 76, § 3; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 71.

35-4-23.
Rhode Island capital plan funds.

From the proceeds of any receipts transferred pursuant to the provisions of the Rhode Island Constitution, the state controller is authorized to create an account or accounts within the bond capital fund. These accounts shall be used to record expenditures from these receipts, which are authorized to be spent with the approval of the governor. Certain of these funds may be allocated to agencies for the purpose of completing preliminary planning studies for proposed projects. In the event the project is completed with funds appropriated from another source, the preliminary planning funds shall be returned to the bond capital fund and shall be placed in a revolving account for future reallocation. The intended use of the Rhode Island capital plan funds shall be determined through the annual capital and operating budget process.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 2, § 6; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 2, § 7; P.L. 1999, ch. 31, art. 21, § 1.

35-4-23.1.
Indirect cost recoveries by state agencies.

All state agencies shall apply for recovery of indirect costs when recovery is permissible under federal statute and grant regulations. All funds received for indirect costs recovery shall be turned over to the general treasurer and shall be placed in a restricted account in each agency for the specific purposes designated through the annual budget process. The agency shall, through the annual budget process, report to the general assembly the estimated amount of federal indirect cost recoveries for the next fiscal year, together with the intended use of the funds. Nothing contained in this section, however, shall conflict with the powers and duties granted the council on postsecondary education and the council on elementary and secondary education in chapters 59 and 60 of title 16, and the board of trustees for the university of Rhode Island as provided in chapter 32 of title 16.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 5, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 11.

35-4-24.
Custodial funds received and held in trust by state agencies.

State agencies which receive funds from wards of the state for the purposes of maintaining these funds in trust while the person is in the care of the state shall deposit these funds in the general fund.

All funds received from patients, wards, inmates, or residents on a custodial or trust basis shall be turned over to the general treasurer and shall be placed in a custodial account within the general fund. The general treasurer will provide the agency with an estimate of earnings on these funds while held in the general fund, and the state controller shall transfer these earnings to the trust account. It will be the responsibility of the agency to determine the allocation of these earnings. The state controller, upon receipt by him or her of properly authenticated vouchers, is authorized to draw from time to time his or her orders upon the general treasurer for payment from these custodial accounts and the general treasurer is authorized and directed to make payments from these accounts upon receipt of the orders.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 5, § 2.

35-4-25.
Funds attributable to agency business operations.

State agencies which operate business-like enterprises at the state institutions shall maintain the funds attributable to these operations in accounts within the general fund. All funds received by the department of corrections, the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, and the department of children, youth, and families from these operations shall be deposited as general revenues. The agency shall, through the annual budget process, report to the general assembly the estimated amount for the next fiscal year, together with the intended use of the funds. Nothing contained in this section, however, shall conflict with the powers and duties granted the board of governors for higher education and the board of regents for elementary and secondary education in chapters 59 and 60 of title 16.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 5, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 109; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 22.

35-4-26.
Funds received from vending machines, private donations, and investments.

All funds received from store or vending machine profits, private donations which are not directed to other accounts, and investment earnings, excluding those earned in resident trust accounts, shall be deposited as general revenues. The agency shall, through the annual budget process, report to the general assembly the estimated amount for the next fiscal year, together with the intended use of the funds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 5, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 109.